South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H5273.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 2, Title 12 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 12-2-150.  If more than two percent of the total number of employees employed by a company are H1B visa holders, then the company is ineligible for any state-provided incentives including, but not limited to, tax incentives, discretionary incentives, grants, local FILOT agreements, and state contracts. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----